Rhode Island statutes. Title 22 General Assembly
Chapter 7.6 Permanent Joint Committee on Small Business

22-7.6-1.
Declaration of purpose — “Small business” defined.

The legislature finds and declares:

That the essence of the American economic system is free competition; and

That only through full and free competition can free markets, free entry into business, and opportunities for the expression and growth of personal initiative and individual judgment be assured; and

That small business stands as a symbol of American character and spirit which includes the traits of individual initiative, self-reliance, and creativity; and

That small business has been a major positive factor in the political, economic, and social development of the state; and

That the future welfare of the state depends on the continued development of small business; and

That the opportunity for all people to participate in a manner and method of their own choosing has been a hallmark of our free enterprise system; and

That the people of the state of Rhode Island must be assured of the opportunity and right to participate in our system of free enterprise; and

That it is the sense of the people of the state of Rhode Island that private enterprise and small business entrepreneurship are essential to the preservation of individual liberty and freedom for all our citizens; and

That all citizens of the state of Rhode Island have the right to live in an economically diverse society; and

That all citizens of the state of Rhode Island have the right to own and manage their own business; and

That all citizens of the state of Rhode Island have an equal entrepreneurial opportunity to participate in our free enterprise system regardless of race, creed, and sex; and

That it shall be the declared policy of the people and the legislature of the state of Rhode Island to preserve, protect, and foster the creation, development, and growth of small business in the state; and

That it shall be the policy of the legislature that all agencies, departments, bureaus and instrumentalities of the state government shall take all possible measures to preserve these rights and aggressively foster small business opportunity; and

That the best method of furthering these legislative policies is through the establishment of a permanent state commission for small business development; and

That small business shall be defined as a person, partnership, corporation, or other form of business entity independently owned and operated, not dominant in its field and which business employs five hundred (500) or fewer employees and has its principal place of business located in the state of Rhode Island. This definition shall apply in the interpretation of any statute, regulation, or executive order.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 334, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 352, § 1.

22-7.6-2.
Permanent committee — Composition.

There is created a permanent joint committee of the general assembly on small business to consist of eleven (11) members of the general assembly, five (5) of whom shall be from the senate to be appointed by the president of the senate, six (6) of whom shall be from the house of representatives to be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives. The chairpersonship of the committee shall alternate biannually from the house to the senate.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 334, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 180, § 29.

22-7.6-3.
Selection of officers.

Upon organization of the joint committee, the president of the senate shall appoint the officers of the joint committee.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 334, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 180, § 29.

22-7.6-4.
Duties.

It shall be the duty of the joint committee to promote the development of legislation affecting small business regulatory matters including, but not limited to, taxation, licensing, loan programs, simplification of government rules and regulations, technical assistance, and assistance in industrial development for both incorporated and unincorporated small businesses.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 334, § 1.

22-7.6-5.
Reports and recommendations.

The joint committee on small business shall from time to time and at least annually report to the general assembly on its findings and the results of its studies, and make any recommendations to the general assembly and propose any legislation or initiate any studies that it shall deem advisable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 334, § 1.

22-7.6-6.
Technical assistance.

The joint committee shall, if it finds it cannot obtain proper assistance from available sources, contract for any technical services that it shall require to effectuate its purposes.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 334, § 1.

22-7.6-7.
References to committee.

Each branch of the legislature shall refer to the joint committee, either initially or after action by other committees, all bills and resolutions dealing with or affecting small business.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 334, § 1.

22-7.6-8.
Place of meeting — Quorum.

The joint committee on legislative services shall provide adequate space in the state house for the use of the joint committee on small business; provided, that the joint committee on small business may conduct hearings and hold meetings elsewhere when doing so will better serve its purposes. A majority in number of the joint committee on small business shall be necessary to constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 334, § 1.